Maine, session 132, LD1654.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §4921, sub-§9-A is enacted to read:
9-A. Products manufacturing facility. "Products manufacturing facility" has the
same meaning as in Title 28-B, section 102-A, subsection 51.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §4923, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 231, Pt. B, §7 and
amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is amended to read:
6. Multiple licenses. When a cultivation facility licensee also holds a license to
operate another cannabis establishment, the taxes imposed by subsections 1 to 4 apply to
any transfer of cannabis from the cultivation facility to the other cannabis establishment
licensee or, if no such transfer is made, to any activity undertaken pursuant to Title 28‑B,
section 501, subsection 2 or 4 with regard to cannabis cultivated by the cultivation facility.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §4923, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Sales and transfers between licensed cultivation facilities. Notwithstanding
subsection 6, an excise tax is not imposed on a sale of adult use cannabis to a cultivation
facility or on a transfer of adult use cannabis to a cultivation facility. This subsection does
not apply to a sale or transfer by a nursery cultivation facility pursuant to Title 28-B, section
501, subsection 3, paragraph C.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §4923, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Transfers to and from products manufacturing facility. Notwithstanding
subsection 6, an excise tax is not imposed on the transfer of adult use cannabis to a products
manufacturing facility when the adult use cannabis is returned to the original cultivation
facility in the same form and weight within 30 days.
Page 1 - 132LR1647(06)